New Jersey, session 222, S2366.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the Safe and Sustainable Transportation Act. 2.    The Legislature finds and declares that: a.     The transportation sector is one of the biggest contributors, both nationally and in the State, to greenhouse gas emissions due to emissions from the use of cars and trucks. b.    By reducing vehicle miles traveled (VMT), which complements the States vehicle electrification efforts, the State can meet its greenhouse gas reduction goals for the transportation sector in a timelier manner. c.     In addition, by putting destinations closer together through more compact, mixed-use developments, the State can reduce both the number and the average length of car trips, both of which could help to reduce overall VMT.  It would also allow some households to reduce their car ownership by either going car-free or car-light and to save on some of the expenses involved in owning a vehicle, which is especially important to lower-income households. d.    Reducing the need to travel by car would produce multiple other benefits that would not necessarily arise from electrifying vehicles, such as reduced traffic congestion, improved pedestrian and bicycle safety, reduced transportation costs for lower-income households, less time spent in the car commuting and running errands, and better public health as a result of more people using active modes of transportation. e.     Therefore, the Legislature determines that it is in the public interest to adopt Statewide targets for reducing VMT within the same timeframe as the States plan to reduce greenhouse gas emissions from the transportation sector. 3.    a.  No later than January 1, 2035: (1)   the level of per capita vehicle miles traveled in the State shall be reduced by 10 percent below the per capita vehicle miles traveled in the State in 2019; and (2)   the level of Statewide vehicle miles traveled shall be reduced by three percent below the Statewide vehicle miles traveled in 2019. b.    No later than January 1, 2050: (1)   the level of per capita vehicle miles traveled in the State shall be reduced by 20 percent below the per capita vehicle miles traveled in the State in 2019; and (2)   the level of Statewide vehicle miles traveled shall be reduced by 8.5 percent below the Statewide vehicle miles traveled in 2019. c.     No later than one year after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), in consultation with the New Jersey Department of Transportation and the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, the New Jersey Department of Environmental Protection shall establish: (1)   an inventory of the prior years and 2019 per capita vehicle miles traveled in the State; and (2)   an inventory of the prior years and 2019 Statewide vehicle miles traveled. 4.    a.  As used in this section: Active transportation network means a transportation network designed to facilitate human-powered mobility, including, but not limited to, biking and walking, that requires pedestrian- and cyclist-forward infrastructure, including, but not limited to, sidewalks, bike lanes, bike paths, overpasses, crosswalks, and bike racks, to ensure the safe movement of pedestrians and cyclists while reducing vehicle emissions and promoting public health. Commission means the Vehicle Miles Traveled Advisory Commission established pursuant to this section. Smart growth means a community planning theory that uses development and conservation strategies that prioritize public health and environmental preservation to develop communities that are economically strong and resilient to climate change. b.    (1) There is established, in but not of the Department of Environmental Protection, the Vehicle Miles Traveled Advisory Commission, which shall consist of the following 11 members: (a)   the Commissioner of Transportation, ex officio, or the commissioners designee; (b)   the Commissioner of Environmental Protection, ex officio, or the commissioners designee; (c)   the Commissioner of Community Affairs, ex officio, or the commissioners designee; (d)   the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, ex officio, or the chief administrators designee; (e)   the Chief Executive Officer of the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, ex officio, or the chief executive officers designee; (f)   the Executive Director of the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, ex officio, or the executive directors designee; (g)   the Chief Executive Officer of the New Jersey Redevelopment Authority, ex officio, or the chief executive officers designee; (h)   the Executive Director of the Office of Planning Advocacy, ex officio, or the executive directors designee; (i)    a public member, appointed by the Governor, with a background in public transportation; (j)    a public member, appointed by the Governor, with a background in active transportation networks; and (k)   a public member, appointed by the Governor, with a background in smart growth. (2)   Vacancies in the commission shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments were made. (3)   The Commissioner of Environmental Protection and the Commissioner of Transportation, or their designees, shall serve as co-chairs of the commission and shall be responsible for coordinating all commission activities. (4)   The members of the commission shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary and actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties to the extent that funds are made available for that purpose. c.     The commission shall organize as soon as practicable following the appointment of a majority of its members but no later than 60 days after the effective date of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  Each year, the commission shall meet at least twice to, at a minimum: (1)   review, establish, collect, and publicize metrics for tracking the States progress in reducing vehicle miles traveled on the Internet website of one of the State entities with membership in the commission; (2)   review any plans developed by relevant State entities to reduce vehicle miles traveled; (3)   assess and publicize Statewide progress toward achieving vehicle miles traveled reduction targets established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); and (4)   submit a written report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, recommending changes to State policies and programs to help the State achieve the vehicle miles traveled reduction targets established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). d.    The Department of Environmental Protection shall provide stenographic, clerical, and other administrative assistance and professional staff as the commission requires to execute the commissions responsibilities outlined in subsection c. of this section. 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.